Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 2.3. Equal Credit Opportunity Act.

§§ 59.1-21.19 through 59.1-21.28.

Repealed by Acts 2010, c. 794, cl. 11, effective October 1, 2010.

Editor’s note.

This chapter was repealed by Acts 2010, c. 794, cl. 11, and recodified as Chapter 5 (§

6.2-500

et seq.) of Title 6.2, effective October 1, 2010.

Former § 59.1-21.21 was repealed by Acts 1977, c. 589.